District of Columbia statutes.
7-2507.09

Applicability of District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act.

The provisions of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act (§ 2-501 et seq.) shall apply to each proceeding, decision, or other administrative action specified in this unit, unless otherwise specifically provided.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VII, § 710, 23 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 6-2379.
1973 Ed., § 6-1879.